District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-139

Investment of public funds in financial institutions and companies making loans to or doing business with South Africa — Mayor’s order

Repealed.

History

June 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-134, § 5, 41 DCR 2597

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 47-139 to 47-142.